Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 45.1 Unreasonable Noise Levels

11-45.1-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to prohibit unreasonable, excessive and annoying noise levels from all sources subject to its police power. At certain levels, low frequency sound (between 100-20 cps) when substantially amplified, often referred to as sub-woofer frequency, can be extremely penetrating, disturbing and poses a danger to the health and safety of the individual using equipment creating the sound, and to other individuals in the immediate area from which the sound is being generated. The noise being generated may originate from radios, CD players, DVD players, tape players, televisions and other audio-producing equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 203, § 1.

11-45.1-2.
Violations of acceptable noise levels.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any equipment as set forth in §

11-45.1-1

from which the sound created by this equipment is capable of penetrating a closed vehicle from twenty (20) feet away from the location at which the sound is being generated, or heard from one hundred (100) feet away by a person outside from which the sound is originating. This section shall include, but not be limited to, sound electronically generated by autos, trucks, motor homes, mobile homes, houses, apartment buildings, condominiums, commercial buildings, or from any type of portable sound producing equipment that can be carried or placed outdoors which through its operation exceeds the provision of this chapter. All state and municipal vehicles shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter, nor any person firm, corporation or other legal entity which holds a valid state or municipal entertainment license to sponsor a parade, carnival or other similar special event.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 203, § 1.

11-45.1-3.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for a first offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for a second offense, and three hundred dollars ($300) for the third and any subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 203, § 1.